Wyoming, session 2026, SF0032.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 16-9-113 is created to read:
16-9-113. 911 study and grants.
(a) From funds appropriated for that purpose, the
department of transportation shall conduct a study, with
input from the stakeholders and industry, examining the
transition to next generation 911 within the state of
Wyoming. The study shall include, without limitation,
governance of the 911 system, operations, expenses,
efficiencies and funding. The results of the study under
this subsection shall be reported to the joint
corporations, elections and political subdivisions interim
committee not later than September 1, 2027.
(b) From funds appropriated for that purpose, the
department of transportation is authorized to provide
grants to a governing body for any shortfall in funding
necessary to operate the current 911 system. Any governing
body that currently operates a 911 system may apply to the
department of transportation for a grant as provided in
this section. The governing body shall submit an
application to the department detailing the shortfall in
funding and any other information required by the
department. The department shall approve a grant for any
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0032
ENROLLED ACT NO. 15, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
amounts requested in an application that the department
determines are necessary to operate the current 911 system.
Section 2. W.S. 16-9-102(a)(x) is amended to read:
16-9-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(x) "This act" means W.S. 16-9-101 through
16-9-111 16-9-113;
Section 3. The department of transportation shall
begin accepting applications for grants under W.S.
16-9-113(b) as created by section 1 of this act not later
than July 1, 2026.
Section 4. There is appropriated three million seven
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,750,000.00) from the
legislative stabilization reserve account to the department
of transportation for purposes of this act for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2028. Of this appropriation, three million dollars
($3,000,000.00) shall only be used to award grants to
governing bodies under W.S. 16-9-113(b) as created by
section 1 of this act and seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($750,000.00) shall only be used to conduct the
study required under W.S. 16-9-113(a) as created by section
1 of this act. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0032
ENROLLED ACT NO. 15, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3